Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-205
Change in service; requirements.

(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no telecommunications company shall submit on behalf of a subscriber a change of the subscriber's provider of basic local exchange service, intra-LATA interexchange service, or inter-LATA interexchange service without:

(i) Written change authorization from the subscriber;

(ii) Toll-free electronic authorization placed from the telephone number which is the subject of the change of service order; or

(iii) Oral authorization obtained by an independent third party.

(b) A separate and distinct authorization shall be required to submit a change of service order for any or all of the following telecommunications services provided to subscribers in this state: Basic local exchange service, intra-LATA interexchange service, inter-LATA interexchange service, or any other telecommunications service.

(2) The requirements of this section shall not apply to a change of a subscriber's provider of basic local exchange service, intra-LATA interexchange service, or inter-LATA interexchange service that results from any merger or sale of exchanges or transfer of authority approved by the commission.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 389, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-1905;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 67.